test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k40_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - hógvur : # k_40
    hógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hógvur
    hógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: hógv
    hógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: hógvi
    hógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: hóvs
    hógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: hógvar
    hógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: hógvar
    hógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: hógvum
    hógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: hógva
    hógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: hógvurin
    hógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: hógvin
    hógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: [hónum, hógvinum]
    hógvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: hóvsins
    hógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: hógvarnir
    hógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: hógvarnar
    hógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: hógvunum
    hógvur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: hógvanna
